Louisiana, session 2026, HB1249.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:171.1 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§171.1. School-based health center services for students
A.(1)(a) If a student's parent or legal guardian or a student who has reached
the age of majority consents to medically necessary school-based health center
services, no school administrator or other school employee shall prohibit the student
from accessing the services.
(b) The provisions of this Section shall apply to school-based health center
services provided on a school campus through a school-based health center or other
provider arrangement; however, nothing in this Section shall be construed to require
any public school governing authority or school to establish or provide such services.
(2) The governing authority of any public school where school-based health
center services are available to students shall adopt and make available to the public
a policy to implement the provisions of this Section. The policy shall not create
onerous requirements for healthcare providers resulting in a delay or barrier to the
provision of medically necessary school-based health center services. The policy,
at a minimum, shall provide that:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1249 ENROLLED
(a) Healthcare providers who are licensed, certified, or registered by their
applicable licensing, certification, or registration board, who provide documentation
of having passed a criminal background check conducted by the Louisiana State
Police, and who are in good standing with the applicable board shall not be required
by a public school governing authority to complete an additional criminal
background check in order to begin providing school-based health center services.
(b) A public school governing authority may not prohibit a health evaluation,
assessment, or authorized treatment plan from being performed on school property
in order to establish medical necessity or deliver medically necessary services. The
school and the school-based health center shall work collaboratively, in accordance
with the school's policy, to create a student visitation and treatment schedule that
meets the medical needs of the student, complies with the healthcare provider's
ethical code of conduct, and considers the impact on the school's operations and the
student's instructional time and testing schedules. The provisions of this
Subparagraph shall be consistent with Subparagraph (d) of this Paragraph.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, a school-
based health center shall not be required to enter into a consent to release
information agreement with a public school governing authority that requires the
disclosure of protected health information. Any information shared by a school-
based health center with a public school governing authority shall be limited to
nonclinical information necessary for care coordination, student safety, or
compliance with applicable law and shall be subject to all applicable state and
federal confidentiality requirements, including but not limited to the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act.
(d) The determination of the need for health evaluation and school-based
health center services shall be made by a healthcare provider acting within the scope
of his professional license. No school employee who is not licensed to provide
healthcare services shall determine whether a student may receive an evaluation or
treatment by a healthcare provider.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1249 ENROLLED
(e) A parent or legal guardian may, at any time, revoke consent granted for
a student to receive school-based health center services.
(3) The failure of a public school governing authority to adopt a policy shall
not be cause to prohibit the provision of school-based health center services to a
student as provided in this Section.
(4) School-based health center services shall be delivered by healthcare
providers licensed, certified, or registered by their applicable health profession
licensing board.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means a physician or other healthcare practitioner
who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by law to provide
health care services consistent with state law.
(2) "Medically necessary" means that services meet the following
requirements as determined by the healthcare provider, as applicable, or the
applicable independent third-party payor:
(a) The services are for the diagnosis, treatment, cure, or relief of a health
condition, illness, injury, or disease.
(b) The services are within the generally accepted standards of medical care
in the community.
(c) The services are not solely for the convenience of the insured, the
insured's family, or the provider.
(3) "School-based health center services" means primary health or behavioral
health services delivered to students through a school-based health center or other
provider arrangement, including but not limited to fixed-site clinics, mobile units,
and other models operated by healthcare providers.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to conflict with or interfere
with a student's access to behavioral health services provided pursuant to R.S.
17:173.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1249 ENROLLED
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) School-based health center services for students, R.S. 17:171.1.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.